Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Prepaid Funeral Arrangements

§ 1271.
Prepaid arrangements.

A funeral establishment that sells services or merchandise that is not to be delivered or provided within 30 days of sale has entered into a prepaid funeral arrangement and shall comply with the requirements of this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. Jan. 1, 1993; amended

2013, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 8.

§ 1272.
Rules; prepaid funeral funds.

The Director shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this subchapter to ensure the proper handling of all funds paid pursuant to a prepaid funeral agreement and to protect consumers in the event of default. The rules shall include provisions relating to the following:

The timely establishment of escrow accounts and verification of the establishment of an account. An escrow account shall be maintained by a federally insured depository institution, but shall not be required to be maintained by a trust department, an insurance company licensed to do business in Vermont that is a member of the Vermont’s Property and Casualty Insurance Guaranty Association established by 8 V.S.A. chapter 101, subchapter 9, or a trust company chartered by the State of Vermont, if that insurance or trust company is a federally insured depository.

The appointment of an escrow agent who may be a bank or other category of individual such as an attorney, a local elected official, next of kin, or the executor of a buyer’s estate. All prepaid arrangement funds shall be paid directly to the escrow agent and not to the funeral director or establishment.

Permissible investments to include demand and time deposits, certificates of deposit, bonds of the United States or its agencies, bonds of the State of Vermont, bonds of a Vermont municipality, and bonds in which savings banks in this State may, by law, invest.

The crediting of income earned by an escrow account, use of the taxpayer identification number, and the deduction of reasonable administrative costs, taxes, and bank fees. The beneficiary shall be considered to be the owner of irrevocable escrow accounts.

Information to be provided the escrow agent by the funeral director and information regarding the escrow account or the prepaid funeral that shall be made available to the buyer on request and annually in a format as determined by the Director.

Records to be kept, manner of disclosure, and clauses to be included in contracts, including pre-need trust forms, and agreements. Records shall include a copy of the prepaid arrangement check, which shall be kept in the prepaid account file maintained by the funeral director.

Preparation of appropriate tax and other reports.

Other factors determined by the Director to be reasonably necessary to ensure the security of the funds paid into an escrow account as part of a prepaid funeral arrangement.

Establishment of a funeral services trust account.

For purposes of funding the Funeral Services Trust Account, the Office shall assess each funeral or crematory establishment a per funeral, burial, or disposition fee of $6.00.

The Account shall be administered by the Secretary of State and shall be used for the sole purpose of protecting prepaid funeral contract holders in the event a funeral establishment defaults on its obligations under the contract.

The Account shall consist of all fees collected under this subdivision (9) and any assessments authorized by the General Assembly. The principal and interest remaining in the Account at the close of any fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain in the Account for use in succeeding fiscal years.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this subdivision (9) to the contrary, if the fund balance at the beginning of a fiscal year is at least $200,000.00, no fees shall be imposed during that fiscal year.

Payments on consumer claims from the fund shall be made on warrants by the Commissioner of Finance and Management, at the direction of the Director.

When an investigation reveals financial discrepancies within a licensed establishment, the Director may order an audit to determine the existence of possible claims on the Funeral Services Trust Account. In cases where both a funeral and crematory establishment are involved in a disposition, the party receiving the burial permit shall be responsible for the disposition fee.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. Jan. 1, 1993; amended

1995, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1997, No. 50

, § 2, eff. June 26, 1997;

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. June 27, 2002;

2005, No. 27

, § 44a;

2009, No. 35

, § 22;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 1272a.
Activities connected with funeral.

A funeral establishment may offer food and drink in connection with a funeral, provided the establishment complies with applicable requirements of the Department of Health.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 40

, § 22d.

§ 1273.
Written agreements.

Each prepaid funeral arrangement shall be expressed in a written contract. The Director shall adopt rules for standard provisions to be included in all pre-need trust forms and may adopt a standard form that every funeral director accepting prepaid funeral arrangements shall use. Those provisions shall include:

Disclosure of whether the contract is revocable or irrevocable.

A declaration of the person who will most likely be responsible for the funeral and who is to be notified of the prepaid funeral.

Any other provision determined by the Director to be reasonably necessary to ensure full disclosure to the buyer of all prepaid funeral arrangements as required under this chapter.

The contract shall itemize the funeral services and merchandise to be provided. At the time of performance, if the itemized merchandise is no longer reasonably available, the funeral director may substitute merchandise similar in style and at least equal in quality of material and workmanship.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. Jan. 1, 1993; amended

1995, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2009, No. 35

, § 23;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 1274.
Transfer of contracts and assets.

A buyer of prepaid funeral arrangements may transfer a revocable or irrevocable contract and assets to another funeral director under similar arrangements, in Vermont or outside. The funeral director who originated the contract may charge the buyer a transfer fee of no more than five percent of the principal amount of the assets.

A funeral director shall transfer a contract and assets to another funeral director if any of the following events occur:

The funeral director’s business is sold.

The funeral director becomes insolvent or bankrupt.

The funeral director ceases to do business. Before transferring a contract and assets under this subsection, the funeral director shall notify the buyer of the director’s intent to make such a transfer, and the buyer may choose the funeral director to whom the contract and assets will be transferred.

If a buyer of a prepaid funeral arrangement defaults in making payments required under the terms of the contract, or if the buyer or the person responsible for making funeral arrangements for the deceased beneficiary fails to have the funeral director provide services, the funeral director may retain up to five percent of the amount in the escrow account at the time of default. The escrow agent shall pay the amount retained to the funeral director and the balance to the buyer when the funeral director gives written notice of default.

The assets held in an escrow account, including any earnings on the assets, shall not be available to the funeral director and shall be exempt from levy or execution for the debts of the funeral director, except as otherwise provided in this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. Jan. 1, 1993.

§ 1275.
Duties of escrow agents.

An escrow agent appointed in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter shall maintain funds in an escrow account intact, unless commingled in a single account with other such funds, or until the services contracted for are performed, and the merchandise delivered, the buyer defaults, or the contract and assets are transferred under section 1274 of this title. When the funeral director submits a death certificate and acknowledgment that the contract has been performed, the escrow agent shall pay to the funeral director the amount deposited and all income earned thereon and retained in the account. The certificate and affidavit shall be sufficient to authorize the escrow agent, acting alone, to make such payment without liability to any other person.

If, for any reason, the funeral director fails promptly to meet his or her obligation under the contract upon the death of the beneficiary, the next of kin or personal representative of the deceased person, having provided for such services, may receive from the escrow agent the amount of money in the escrow account. An affidavit that states that services have been performed or property delivered, signed by the next of kin or personal representative and the funeral director who has provided such services, shall be sufficient to authorize the escrow agent, acting alone, to make such payment without liability to any other person. Nothing contained in this section shall excuse nonperformance by a funeral director.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. Jan. 1, 1993.

§ 1276.
Embalming fluids and compounds; sale or use; prohibition.

The sale or use for embalming purposes of any fluid containing arsenic, zinc, mercury, copper, lead, silver, antimony, chloral, or cyanogen, or of any compound containing any of these, or any poisonous alkaloid, shall be prohibited, and all brands of embalming compounds used within the State shall be tested and approved under direction of the State Board of Health.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 35

, § 24.

§ 1277.
Suspicious cases.

A person shall not embalm or introduce any fluid into a body of a person who has died under suspicious circumstances or when a criminal cause of death is suspected until after a legal investigation has determined the facts. An embalmer shall forthwith report any such case to the office of the Chief Medical Examiner and obtain permission to embalm the body.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 35

, § 25.